North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 3. Dissolution and Liquidation. [Repealed]

§§ 53-18 through 53-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-18; 1921, c. 4, s. 15; C.S., s. 218(a); 1927, c. 47, s. 4; 1929, c. 73; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 3; 1995, c. 129, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-19; 1911, c. 25, s. 4; 1921, c. 4, s. 16; C.S., ss. 218(b), 242; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1995, c. 129, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-20; 1921, c. 4, s. 17; C.S., s. 218(c); 1927, c. 113; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; cc. 385, 405; 1933, c. 175, s. 2; c. 546; 1935, c. 81, s. 4; c. 231, s. 1; c. 277; 1939, c. 91; 1947, c. 621, s. 1; 1971, c. 1135, s. 4; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1311, s. 4; 1991, c. 677, s. 1; 1995, c. 129, ss. 4, 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-21; 1935, c. 113; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-22; 1921, c. 4, s. 19; 1923, c. 148, s. 4; C.S., s. 218(e); 1931, c. 215; 1955, c. 1371, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-23; 1921, c. 4, s. 20; C.S., s. 218(f); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-24; 1939, c. 91, s. 1; c. 135; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-25; 1931, c. 250, s. 1; 2001-263, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-26; 1931, c. 250, s. 2; 1995, c. 129, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-27; 1931, c. 250, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-28; 1931, c. 250, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-29; 1931, c. 250, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-30; 1931, c. 250, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-31; 1931, c. 250, s. 7; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-32; 1931, c. 250, s. 8; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-33; 1931, c. 403; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-34; 1931, c. 132; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-35; 1939, c. 368; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-36; 1933, c. 483; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.